Maine, session 132, LD1986.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Adjustment of salary schedules for fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-
27. The salaries and stipends for the Judicial Department employees in the administrative
services bargaining unit, the supervisory services bargaining unit, the law enforcement
bargaining unit and the professional services bargaining unit and employees referred to in
section 2 must be adjusted consistent with the terms of any agreements ratified by
December 31, 2025.
Sec. 2. Other employees; similar and equitable treatment. The State Court
Administrator is authorized to grant similar and equitable treatment consistent with this Act
for employees of the Judicial Department who are excluded from collective bargaining
Page 1 - 132LR2566(02)

pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 26, section 1282, subsection 5, paragraphs C,
D, E and F.
Sec. 3. Costs to General Fund. Costs to the General Fund must be provided in
the Salary Plan program, General Fund account in the Department of Administrative and
Financial Services up to a $10,000,000.00 combined total for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026 and the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027 to implement the economic terms of the
collective bargaining agreements made between the Judicial Department and the Maine
Service Employees Association for the administrative services bargaining unit, the
supervisory services bargaining unit and the professional services bargaining unit; made
between the Judicial Department and the Maine State Law Enforcement Association for
the law enforcement bargaining unit; and for the costs of those Judicial Department
employees referred to in section 2 who are excluded from collective bargaining pursuant
to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 26, section 1282, subsection 5, paragraphs C, D, E and
F.
Sec. 4. Contingent effective date. This Act takes effect only upon the ratification
by December 31, 2025 of collective bargaining agreements made between the Judicial
Department and the Maine Service Employees Association for the administrative services
bargaining unit, the supervisory services bargaining unit and the professional services
bargaining unit and between the Judicial Department and the Maine State Law
Enforcement Association for the law enforcement bargaining unit.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2566(02)